North Carolina, session 2025, SB109.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1C reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1C. Disabled veteran property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The amount excluded from taxation
is the first forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) of appraised value of the residence is excluded
from taxation. plus any portion of the appraised value of the residence attributable to adaptations
for the qualifying owner's medical needs if the adaptations were funded by a housing grant from
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for one or more service-connected disabilities.
A qualifying owner who receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other property
tax relief.
…
(f) Application. – An application for the exclusion allowed under this section should be
filed during the regular listing period, but may be filed and must be accepted at any time up to
and through June 1 preceding the tax year for which the exclusion is claimed. An applicant for
an exclusion under this section must establish eligibility for the exclusion by providing a copy of
the veteran's disability certification or evidence of benefits received under 38 U.S.C. § 2101. An
applicant who has prequalified pursuant to subsection (g) of this section may provide a copy of
the prequalification notice provided by the assessor under subsection (g) of this section to
establish eligibility for the exclusion provided in this section in lieu of a veteran's disability
certification or evidence of benefits received under 38 U.S.C. § 2101.
(g) Prequalification. – A disabled veteran may apply for prequalification of the property
tax relief provided by this section notwithstanding that the veteran is not an owner of a permanent
residence at the time that the veteran's application for prequalification is submitted. It is the intent
of the General Assembly to allow taxpayers and lenders to determine, in advance of the purchase
of a primary residence, the availability of the tax benefit provided by this section in order to
facilitate omitting exempted amounts from determinations of payment calculations. An
application for prequalification under this subsection may be filed at any time and must be
*S109-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
submitted on a form approved by the Department. Application forms under this subsection must
be made available by the assessor. Upon receipt of an application under this subsection, the
assessor of the county in which the application is filed must notify the applicant of the applicant's
qualification for eligibility for property tax relief under this section within 30 days. Upon
purchasing a permanent residence, an applicant who has received prequalification under this
subsection must apply for the property tax relief provided by this section as required under
subsection (f) of this section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 109-First Edition